Florida, session 2026, SB92.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 86 87 Section 1.âSubsection (18) is added to section 112.313, 88 Florida Statutes, to read: 89 112.313âStandards of conduct for public officers, employees 90 of agencies, and local government attorneys.â 91 (18)âRETALIATION FOR PROTECTED ACTIVITY PROHIBITED.â 92 (a)âAs used in this subsection, the term: 93 1.ââAdverse personnel actionâ means the discharge, 94 suspension, transfer, or demotion of an employee; the 95 withholding of bonuses or reduction in salary or benefits of an 96 employee; or any other adverse action taken against an employee 97 within the terms and conditions of employment by an agency or 98 independent contractor of an agency. 99 2.ââExercise of ultimate decisionmaking authorityâ or 100 âgrant of approvalâ means having and using the authority to 101 commence an adverse personnel action. 102 3.ââProtected activityâ means submitting a written 103 complaint to the commission executed on the form specified in s. 104 112.324(1) and signed under oath or affirmation or providing 105 information to an investigator during an investigation of a 106 complaint or referral. 107 (b)âA public officer, public employee, or local government 108 attorney commits a breach of the public trust when he or she 109 initiates an adverse personnel action against an agency employee 110 or independent contractor who has engaged in a protected 111 activity by an exercise of the public officerâs, public 112 employeeâs, or local government attorneyâs ultimate 113 decisionmaking authority or a grant of his or her approval, or 114 uses his or her position to cause another to initiate such an 115 adverse personnel action, if the protected activity is the 116 primary reason motivating the adverse personnel action. The 117 communication or execution of an adverse personnel action 118 initiated by anotherâs ultimate decisionmaking authority or 119 grant of approval does not constitute an exercise of oneâs 120 ultimate decisionmaking authority or a grant of oneâs approval. 121 Section 2.âSection 112.3242, Florida Statutes, is created 122 to read: 123 112.3242âAdverse action against employee for disclosing 124 information of specified nature to the Commission on Ethics 125 prohibited; employee remedy and relief.â 126 (1)âLEGISLATIVE INTENT.âIt is the intent of the Legislature 127 to prevent agencies or independent contractors from taking 128 retaliatory action against an employee who reports to an 129 appropriate agency any violation of this part or s. 8, Art. II 130 of the State Constitution on the part of a public employer or an 131 independent contractor. It is further the intent of the 132 Legislature to prevent agencies or independent contractors from 133 taking retaliatory action against any person who discloses 134 information to an appropriate agency regarding alleged breaches 135 of the public trust or violations of s. 8, Art. II of the State 136 Constitution on the part of an agency, a public officer, or an 137 employee. 138 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section and s. 112.3243, 139 unless otherwise specified, the term: 140 (a)ââAdverse personnel actionâ means the discharge, 141 suspension, transfer, or demotion of any employee or the 142 withholding of bonuses, the reduction in salary or benefits, or 143 any other adverse action taken against an employee within the 144 terms and conditions of employment by an agency or independent 145 contractor. 146 (b)ââAgencyâ means any state, regional, county, local, or 147 municipal governmental entity, whether executive, judicial, or 148 legislative; any official, officer, department, division, 149 bureau, commission, authority, or political subdivision therein; 150 or any public school, community college, or state university. 151 (c)ââEmployeeâ means a person who performs services for, 152 and is under the control and direction of, or contracts with, an 153 agency or independent contractor for wages or other 154 remuneration. 155 (d)ââIndependent contractorâ means a person, other than an 156 agency, who is engaged in any business and enters into a 157 contract, including a provider agreement, with an agency. 158 (3)âACTIONS PROHIBITED.â 159 (a)âAn agency or independent contractor may not dismiss, 160 discipline, or take any other adverse personnel action against 161 an employee for disclosing information protected under this 162 section. 163 (b)âAn agency or independent contractor may not take any 164 adverse personnel action that affects the rights or interests of 165 a person in retaliation for the personâs disclosure of 166 information protected under this section. 167 (c)âThis subsection does not apply when an employee or a 168 person discloses information known by the employee or person to 169 be false or when the employee or person discloses information 170 that forms the basis of an award of costs or attorney fees or 171 both pursuant to s. 112.317(7). 172 (4)âNATURE OF INFORMATION DISCLOSED.âThe protected 173 information disclosed under this section must include any 174 violation or suspected violation of: 175 (a)âAny standard of conduct imposed by this part; 176 (b)âSection 8, Art. II of the State Constitution; or 177 (c)âSection 11.062, s. 16.715, part II of chapter 287, s. 178 350.031, s. 350.04, s. 350.041, s. 350.042, or s. 350.0605. 179 (5)âTO WHOM INFORMATION IS DISCLOSED.âThe information 180 disclosed under this section must be disclosed to the 181 commission. 182 (6)âEMPLOYEES AND PERSONS PROTECTED.âThis section protects 183 employees and persons who submit a written complaint to the 184 commission executed on the form specified in s. 112.324(1) and 185 signed under oath or affirmation or who provide information to 186 an investigator during an investigation of a complaint. A remedy 187 or other protection under this section does not apply to any 188 employee or person who has committed or intentionally 189 participated in committing the violation or suspected violation 190 for which protection under this section is being sought. 191 (7)âREMEDIES.âAny employee of or applicant for employment 192 with an agency who is subjected to adverse personnel action 193 because he or she engaged in an activity protected by this 194 section may file a complaint, which must be made in accordance 195 with s. 112.3243. Upon receipt of notice from the commission of 196 termination of the investigation, the complainant may elect to 197 pursue the administrative remedy available under s. 112.3243 or 198 bring a civil action within 180 days after receipt of the 199 notice. 200 (8)âRELIEF.âIn any action brought under this section, the 201 relief must include the following: 202 (a)âReinstatement of the employee to the same position held 203 before the adverse personnel action was commenced, or to an 204 equivalent position, or reasonable front pay as an alternative 205 relief. 206 (b)âReinstatement of the employeeâs full fringe benefits 207 and seniority rights, as appropriate. 208 (c)âCompensation to the employee, if appropriate, for lost 209 wages, benefits, or other lost remuneration caused by the 210 adverse personnel action. 211 (d)âPayment of reasonable costs, including attorney fees, 212 to a substantially prevailing employee, or to the prevailing 213 employer if the employee filed a frivolous action in bad faith. 214 (e)âIssuance of an injunction, if appropriate, by a court 215 of competent jurisdiction. 216 (f)âTemporary reinstatement of the employee to his or her 217 former position or to an equivalent position, pending the final 218 outcome on the complaint, if an employee complains of being 219 discharged in retaliation for a protected disclosure and if a 220 court of competent jurisdiction or the commission, as applicable 221 under s. 112.3243, determines that the disclosure was not made 222 in bad faith or for a wrongful purpose or that the disclosure 223 occurred after an agencyâs or independent contractorâs 224 initiation of a personnel action against the employee which 225 includes documentation of the employeeâs violation of a 226 disciplinary standard or performance deficiency. This paragraph 227 does not apply to an employee of a municipality. 228 (9)âDEFENSE.âIt is an affirmative defense to any action 229 brought pursuant to this section that the adverse personnel 230 action was predicated upon grounds other than, and would have 231 been taken absent, the employeeâs or personâs exercise of rights 232 protected by this section. 233 (10)âEXISTING RIGHTS.âThis section does not diminish the 234 rights, privileges, or remedies of an employee under any other 235 law or rule or under any collective bargaining agreement or 236 employment contract; however, the election of remedies in s. 237 447.401 also applies to actions under this section. 238 Section 3.âParagraphs (g) and (h) are added to subsection 239 (2) of section 112.324, Florida Statutes, to read: 240 112.324âProcedures on complaints of violations and 241 referrals; public records and meeting exemptions.â 242 (2) 243 (g)âNotwithstanding the exemptions in paragraphs (a)-(d), 244 the Commission on Ethics shall deliver a copy of an ethics 245 complaint, and its timely amendments, to the Public Employees 246 Relations Commission upon receiving a written request from the 247 agency. The Commission on Ethicsâ delivery of the complaint, and 248 any amendment thereto, does not affect the exemptions in 249 paragraphs (a)-(d) in any other context. The Commission on 250 Ethics shall deliver the complaint, and any amendment thereto, 251 within a reasonable timeframe. If the exemptions in paragraphs 252 (a)-(d) are applicable at the time of the request, the 253 commission must redact any designation to the complaint form it 254 supplied after the form was filed, including, but not limited 255 to, date stamps, receipt stamps, and complaint serial numbers. 256 (h)âNotwithstanding the exemptions in paragraphs (a)-(d), 257 the commission shall deliver a copy of an ethics complaint, and 258 its timely amendments, to the person who filed the ethics 259 complaint and identified himself or herself in the text of the 260 complaint or its timely amendments as a current or former 261 employee of the agency associated with the respondent named in 262 the complaint or of an independent contractor of that agency, 263 upon receiving a notarized, written request from such person. 264 The commissionâs delivery of the complaint, and any amendment 265 thereto, does not affect the exemptions in paragraphs (a)-(d) in 266 any other context. The commission shall deliver the complaint 267 within a reasonable timeframe. If the exemptions in paragraphs 268 (a)-(d) are applicable at the time of the request, the 269 commission must redact any designation to the complaint form it 270 supplied after the form was filed, including, but not limited 271 to, date stamps, receipt stamps, and complaint serial numbers. 272 Section 4.âSection 112.3243, Florida Statutes, is created 273 to read: 274 112.3243âInvestigative procedures in response to prohibited 275 personnel actions against ethics complaints.â 276 (1)âCOMPLAINT.â 277 (a)âIf a disclosure under s. 112.3242 results in alleged 278 retaliation by an employer, the employee or former employee of 279 an agency or independent contractor that is so affected may file 280 a complaint alleging a prohibited personnel action, which must 281 be made by filing a written complaint with the commission no 282 later than 60 days after the prohibited personnel action. 283 (b)âWithin 5 working days after receiving a complaint under 284 this section, the commission shall acknowledge receipt of the 285 complaint and provide copies of the complaint and any other 286 preliminary information available concerning the disclosure of 287 information under s. 112.3242 to the employer, who shall 288 acknowledge receipt of such copies to the complainant. 289 (2)âFACT-FINDING.âThe commission shall: 290 (a)âReceive any allegation of a personnel action prohibited 291 by s. 112.3242, including a proposed or potential action, and 292 conduct informal fact-finding regarding any allegation of a 293 legally sufficient complaint under this section to the extent 294 necessary to determine whether there are reasonable grounds to 295 believe that a prohibited personnel action under s. 112.3242 has 296 occurred, is occurring, or is to be taken. 297 (b)âWithin 180 days after receiving the complaint, provide 298 the agency head or independent contractor and the complainant 299 with a fact-finding report that may include recommendations to 300 the parties or a proposed resolution of the complaint. The fact 301 finding report is admissible in any subsequent or related 302 administrative or judicial review. 303 (3)âINVESTIGATIVE POWERS AND TERMINATION OF INVESTIGATION.â 304 (a)âThe commission, in accordance with this section, is 305 empowered to: 306 1.âReceive and investigate complaints from employees 307 alleging retaliation by agencies or independent contractors. 308 2.âAdminister oaths, examine witnesses, take statements, 309 issue subpoenas, order the taking of depositions, order 310 responses to written interrogatories, and make appropriate 311 motions to limit discovery, pursuant to investigations under 312 subparagraph 1. 313 3.âCreate fact-finding reports and make determinations 314 regarding investigations under subparagraph 1. 315 (b)âThe commission shall notify a complainant of the status 316 of the investigation and any action taken at such times as the 317 commission deems appropriate. 318 (c)1.âIf the commission determines that, in connection with 319 any investigation, reasonable grounds exist to believe that a 320 prohibited action has occurred, is occurring, or is to be taken 321 which requires corrective action, the commission must report the 322 determination together with a fact-finding report to the agency 323 head or independent contractor and the complainant. The 324 commission may include in the report recommendations for 325 corrective action. 326 2.âIf the commission, in consultation with the individual 327 subject to the prohibited action, finds that the agency or 328 independent contractor has implemented a corrective action in 329 response to the commissionâs determination and fact-finding 330 report, the commission must file such finding with the agency 331 head or independent contractor, together with any written 332 comments that the individual provides, and terminate the 333 investigation. The commission shall provide notice of the 334 termination of its investigation, along with the reason for 335 termination, to the complainant and the agency head or 336 independent contractor. 337 3.âIf the agency or independent contractor, after 35 days, 338 does not implement a corrective action, the commission must 339 terminate the investigation. If an investigation is terminated 340 pursuant to this subparagraph, the commission must provide 341 notice of the termination of its investigation, along with the 342 reason for termination, to the complainant and the agency head 343 or independent contractor, and notify the complainant of the 344 right to appeal under subsection (4). 345 (d)âIf the commission determines that there are no 346 reasonable grounds to believe that a prohibited personnel action 347 has occurred, is occurring, or is to be taken, the commission 348 must terminate its investigation and report its determination, 349 together with a fact-finding report and a notice of termination 350 of investigation, to the agency head or independent contractor 351 and the complainant. 352 (e)âDuring any investigation under this section, 353 disciplinary action may not be taken against an employee of an 354 agency or independent contractor for reporting an alleged 355 prohibited personnel action that is under investigation, or for 356 reporting any related activity, or against any employee for 357 participating in an investigation without notifying the 358 commission. 359 (4)âRIGHT TO APPEAL.â 360 (a)âThe complainant may, within 21 days after receipt of a 361 notice of termination of an investigation from the commission, 362 file a complaint against the employer agency regarding the 363 alleged prohibited personnel action with the Public Employees 364 Relations Commission. The Public Employees Relations Commission 365 has jurisdiction over such complaints under ss. 112.3242 and 366 447.503(4) and (5). 367 (b)âJudicial review of any final order of the commission 368 must be as provided in s. 120.68. 369 (5)âRULEMAKING.âThe commission may adopt rules to implement 370 this section. 371 Section 5.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 372 made by this act to section 112.313, Florida Statutes, in a 373 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 112.3136, Florida 374 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 375 112.3136âStandards of conduct for officers and employees of 376 entities serving as chief administrative officer of political 377 subdivisions.âThe officers, directors, and chief executive 378 officer of a corporation, partnership, or other business entity 379 that is serving as the chief administrative or executive officer 380 or employee of a political subdivision, and any business entity 381 employee who is acting as the chief administrative or executive 382 officer or employee of the political subdivision, for the 383 purposes of the following sections, are public officers and 384 employees who are subject to the following standards of conduct 385 of this part: 386 (1)âSection 112.313, and their âagencyâ is the political 387 subdivision that they serve; however, the contract under which 388 the business entity serves as chief executive or administrative 389 officer of the political subdivision is not deemed to violate s. 390 112.313(3) or (7). 391 Section 6.âThis act shall take effect January 1, 2027.